North Dakota, session 69, HB1243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 26.1-40 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Automobile ownership - Total loss.
1. If an insurer determines an automobile with physical damage coverage incurred a total
loss, or constructive total loss, the insured may retain ownership of the automobile or
allow the insurer to take ownership.
2. An insurer may not require an insured to pay, out of the insurance payment or
otherwise, for the return of an automobile following a determination of total loss.
Page No. 1 25.0697.01000